Montana, session 2025, HB798.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Repealer. Article XIII, section 7, of The Constitution of the State of
Montana is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Two-thirds vote required. Because [section 1] is a legislative proposal
to amend the constitution, Article XIV, section 8, of the Montana constitution requires an affirmative roll call vote
of two-thirds of all the members of the legislature, whether one or more bodies, for passage.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. If approved by the electorate, [this act] is effective
January 1, 2027.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Submission to electorate. [This act] shall be submitted to the qualified
electors of Montana at the general election to be held in November 2026 by printing on the ballot the full title of
[this act] and the following:
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 798

2026
69th Legislature 2025 HB 798.1
[] YES on Constitutional Amendment ____.
[] NO on Constitutional Amendment ____.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 798